Utah statutes.
78A-2-201.   Powers of every court.

Every court has authority to:

(1)  preserve and enforce order in its immediate presence;

(2)  enforce order in the proceedings before it, or before a person authorized to conduct a judicial investigation under its authority;

(3)  provide for the orderly conduct of proceedings before it or its officers;

(4)  compel obedience to its judgments, orders, and process, and to the orders of a judge out of court, in a pending action or proceeding;

(5)  control in furtherance of justice the conduct of its ministerial officers, and of all other persons in any manner connected with a judicial proceeding before it in every matter;

(6)  compel the attendance of persons to testify in a pending action or proceeding, as provided by law;

(7)  administer oaths in a pending action or proceeding, and in all other cases where necessary in the exercise of its authority and duties;

(8)  amend and control its process and orders to conform to law and justice;

(9)  devise and make new process and forms of proceedings, consistent with law, necessary to carry into effect its authority and jurisdiction; and

(10)  enforce rules of the Supreme Court and Judicial Council.

